New Jersey, session 221, A1752.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    R.S.39:3-27 is amended to read as follows: 39:3-27.      No fee shall be charged for the registration of motor vehicles not used for pleasure or hire, owned by the United States, the State of New Jersey, a municipality, county, Regional Air Pollution Control Agency, Passaic Valley Sewerage Commissioners, North Jersey District Water Supply Commission, a county improvement authority created under the "county improvement authorities law" (P.L.1960, c.183), a local school district, a regional school district, a county vocational or technical school, a duly authorized volunteer fire department, a duly authorized volunteer first aid, rescue or emergency squad, any duly recognized auxiliary or reserve police organization of any municipality, hospital, humane society, and anticruelty society in this State, New Jersey wing of the Civil Air Patrol incorporated by the Act of July 1946 (Public Law 476-79th Congress), the American Red Cross, veterans organizations chartered under federal law, chartered local councils in New Jersey of the Boy Scouts of America or the Girl Scouts of the United States of America, chartered local councils in New Jersey of the Boys' Clubs of America or the Girls' Clubs of America, or chartered local organizations of the Police Athletic League or for the registration of ambulances owned by any nonprofit organization. These vehicles shall be registered and display number plates as provided in this title or the [director] chief administrator may, in his discretion, issue special registration certificates and special number plates for any of these motor vehicles which shall be valid for such motor vehicle for a period fixed by the [director] chief administrator which may correspond with the inspection expiration date applicable to such vehicles, which date shall not be later than 26 months after the date of issuance of such certificates.  Upon the expiration or nonrenewal of any special registration the registration certificate and special number marker shall be returned to the [director] chief administrator; provided, however, upon proper application to the [director] chief administrator the special registration and special number marker may be transferred to another motor vehicle acquired by the owner to whom the special registration and marker were issued. (cf: P.L.1995, c.112, s.32) 2.    This act shall take immediately.